Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-408
Lawful purpose, defined.

(1) Lawful purpose shall mean charitable or community betterment purposes, including, but not limited to, one or more of the following:

(a) Benefiting persons by enhancing their opportunity for religious or educational advancement, by relieving or protecting them from disease, suffering, or distress, by contributing to their physical well-being, by assisting them in establishing themselves in life as worthy and useful citizens, or by increasing their comprehension of and devotion to the principles upon which this nation was founded;

(b) Initiating, performing, or fostering worthy public works or enabling or furthering the erection or maintenance of public structures; and

(c) Lessening the burdens borne by government or voluntarily supporting, augmenting, or supplementing services which government would normally render to the people.

(2) Lawful purpose shall not include any activity consisting of an attempt to influence legislation or participate in any political campaign on behalf of any elected official or person who is or has been a candidate for public office.

(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any organization licensed pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act from using its proceeds or profits derived from activities under the act in any activity which benefits and is conducted by the organization, including any charitable, benevolent, humane, religious, philanthropic, recreational, social, educational, civic, or fraternal activity conducted by the organization for the benefit of its members.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 129;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 98.